Utah statutes.
17C-2-402.   Continuing a hearing.
Subject to Section 17C-2-403, the board may continue from time to time a:
(1)  blight hearing;
(2)  plan hearing;
(3)  budget hearing; or
(4)  combined hearing under Section 17C-2-401.
